Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 6. Revocable Trusts.

§ 64.2-750.
Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-546.01; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-751.
Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust. This subsection does not apply to a trust created under an instrument executed before July 1, 2006.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one settlor:

To the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses;

To the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor’s contribution; and

Upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all of the settlors, the trustee shall promptly notify the other settlors of the revocation or amendment.

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method, by any method manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor’s intent.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs.

A settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent, acting in accordance with §

64.2-1612

, under a power of attorney that expressly authorizes such action except to the extent expressly prohibited by the terms of the trust.

A conservator of the settlor or, if no conservator has been appointed, a guardian of the settlor may exercise a settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only (i) to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or (ii) if authorized by the court supervising the conservatorship or guardianship for good cause shown.

A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the settlor or settlor’s successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-546.02; 2010, cc. 455, 632; 2012, c. 614.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Intent to revoke. —

Trial court granted partial summary judgment to the trustee after the conservator and trustee battled over the continued viability of their father’s revocable trust created approximately 10 years earlier; the trial court found that the trust stated how the trust could be revoked, by written instrument delivered to the trustee, and that neither that type of conduct or any other manifestation of intent in the case occurred that would signal the testator’s intent to revoke the trust.
McCall v. Elver, 73 Va. Cir. 328, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 128 (Newport News May 8, 2007) (decided under prior law).

§ 64.2-752.
Settlor’s powers; powers of withdrawal.

While a trust is revocable, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

While a trust is revocable, the trustee may follow a direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms of the trust.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-546.03; 2012, c. 614; 2020, c. 768.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 768, inserted a new subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

§ 64.2-753.
Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust; distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death within the earlier of:

Two years after the settlor’s death; or

Six months after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and a notice informing the person of the trust’s existence, of the trustee’s name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is not subject to liability for doing so unless:

The trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

A potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is commenced within 60 days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined to have been invalid is liable to return any distribution received.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-546.04; 2007, c. 218; 2012, c. 614.